Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.212

Intensive supervision program—Elements.

The department shall, no later than January 1, 1999, implement an intensive supervision program as a part of its parole services that includes, at a minimum, the following program elements:

(1) A process of case management involving coordinated and comprehensive planning, information exchange, continuity and consistency, service provision and referral, and monitoring. The components of the case management system shall include assessment, classification, and selection criteria; individual case planning that incorporates a family and community perspective; a mixture of intensive surveillance and services; a balance of incentives and graduated consequences coupled with the imposition of realistic, enforceable conditions; and service brokerage with community resources and linkage with social networks;

(2) Administration of transition services that transcend traditional agency boundaries and professional interests and include courts, institutions, aftercare, education, social and mental health services, substance abuse treatment, and employment and vocational training; and

(3) A plan for information management and program evaluation that maintains close oversight over implementation and quality control, and determines the effectiveness of both the processes and outcomes of the program.

[ 2020 c 262 s 6; 1997 c 338 s 34.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—1997 c 338 ss 32 and 34: "The legislature finds the present system of transitioning youths from residential status to parole status to discharge is insufficient to provide adequate rehabilitation and public safety in many instances, particularly in cases of offenders at highest risk of reoffending. The legislature further finds that an intensive supervision program based on the following principles holds much promise for positively impacting recidivism rates for juvenile offenders: (1) Progressive increase in responsibility and freedom in the community; (2) facilitation of youths' interaction and involvement with their communities; (3) involvement of both the youth and targeted community support systems such as family, peers, schools, and employers, on the qualities needed for constructive interaction and successful adjustment with the community; (4) development of new resources, supports, and opportunities where necessary; and (5) ongoing monitoring and testing of youth on their ability to abide by community rules and standards.

The legislature intends for the department to create an intensive supervision program based on the principles stated in this section that will be available to the highest risk juvenile offenders placed on parole." [ 1997 c 338 s 33.]

Finding—Evaluation—Report—1997 c 338: See note following RCW 13.40.0357.

Severability—Effective dates—1997 c 338: See notes following RCW 5.60.060.